Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1205
Delay in payment; additional interest
payment.

Except
as provided in section 45-1204, if a periodic or final payment to (1) a contractor
is delayed by more than thirty days after receipt of a properly submitted
periodic or final payment request by the owner or owner's representative or
(2) a subcontractor is delayed by more than ten days after receipt of a periodic
or final payment by the contractor or subcontractor, then the remitting party
shall pay the contractor or subcontractor interest due until such amount is
paid, beginning on the day following the payment due date at the rate of one
percent per month or a pro rata fraction thereof on the unpaid balance. Interest
is due under this section only after the person charged the interest has been
notified of the provisions of this section by the contractor or subcontractor.
Acceptance of progress payments or a final payment shall release all claims
for interest on such payments.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 5.